Maryland, session 2026, HB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
14–105.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MEDICAL FACILITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1146*

HOUSE BILL 1146
(II) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 19–114 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(III) AN AGENCY, A CLINIC, OR AN OFFICE OPERATED UNDER THE
DIRECTION OF THE LOCAL HEALTH OFFICER OR UNDER THE REGULATORY
AUTHORITY OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(3) “PLACE OF WORSHIP” MEANS A NONRESIDENTIAL LOCATION
WHERE MORE THAN ONE INDIVIDUAL ASSEMBLES FOR PURPOSES OF RELIGIOUS OR
SPIRITUAL OBSERVANCE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT A CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN §
14–101 OF THIS TITLE, IN A MEDICAL FACILITY OR A PLACE OF WORSHIP.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND,
IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY IMPOSED FOR THE UNDERLYING CRIME OF
VIOLENCE, ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10
YEARS.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOSED
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.